Utah statutes.
4-2-8.   Temporary advisory committees -- Appointment -- Compensation.

(1)  The commissioner with the permission of the governor, may appoint other advisory committees on a temporary basis to offer technical advice to the department.

(2)  A member of a committee serves at the pleasure of the commissioner.

(3)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

